Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 23
REORGANIZATION

Section

40-23-101. Right to reorganize.

Whenever the railroads, property, and franchises of any railroad company, organized and existing under the laws of this state, are sold and conveyed under or by virtue of any power contained in any trust deed or mortgage or pursuant to the judgment or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction, it is lawful to organize a railroad company under the laws of this state for the purpose of purchasing, maintaining, operating, extending, or completing the railroads, property, and franchises so sold and conveyed.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 150, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5428.

C.L.

§ 2834.

CSA:

C. 139, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 116-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-4-1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1807, § 33, effective July 1.

40-23-102. Power of company so organized.

The railroad company so organized has the power to acquire and purchase the property and franchises so sold and conveyed, and to take, hold, exercise, and enjoy all the estate, franchises, rights, powers, privileges, and claims or demands at law or in equity of the corporation whose property and franchises have been so sold and conveyed; and, in payment of the price therefor, such railroad company may issue its capital stock and bonds and may mortgage its property and franchises with such classification of capital stock and bonds as may be agreed upon by and between such railroad company and the parties who may be beneficially interested or who may have the ownership and control of such property and franchises.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 150, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5429.

C.L.

§ 2835.

CSA:

C. 139, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 116-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-4-2.